Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF611.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97A.451, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Residentsnew text begin and nonresidentsnew text end under age deleted text begin 16deleted text end new text begin 18new text end ; fishing. (a) A residentnew text begin or nonresident new text end under the age of deleted text begin 16deleted text end new text begin 18 new text end years may take fish without a license. (b) A resident new text begin or nonresident new text end under the age of deleted text begin 16deleted text end new text begin 18new text end may net ciscoes and whitefish for personal consumption without the license required under section 97A.475, subdivision 13. A residentnew text begin or nonresidentnew text end netting ciscoes and whitefish under this paragraph must follow all other applicable requirements for netting ciscoes and whitefish for personal consumption. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97A.451, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Residents and nonresidents under age deleted text begin 16deleted text end new text begin 18new text end ; small game. (a) A resident or nonresident under age deleted text begin 16deleted text end new text begin 18new text end may not obtain a small-game license but may take small game by firearms or bow and arrow without a license if the resident or nonresident is: (1) age 14new text begin ,new text end deleted text begin ordeleted text end 15new text begin , 16, or 17new text end and possesses a firearms safety certificate; (2) age 13, possesses a firearms safety certificate, and is accompanied by a parent or guardian; (3) age 13, 14, deleted text begin ordeleted text end 15, new text begin 16, or 17 new text end and possesses an apprentice-hunter validation as provided under section 97B.022; or (4) age 12 or under and is accompanied by a parent or guardian. (b) A residentnew text begin or nonresidentnew text end under age deleted text begin 16deleted text end new text begin 18new text end may take small game, other than wolves, by trapping without a small-game licensedeleted text begin , but a resident 13 years of age or older must havedeleted text end new text begin ornew text end a trapping license. A residentnew text begin or nonresidentnew text end under age deleted text begin 13 may trap small game, other than wolves, without a trapping license, butdeleted text end new text begin 18new text end may not register fisher, otter, bobcat, or pine marten unless the residentnew text begin or nonresidentnew text end is at least age five. Any fisher, otter, bobcat, or pine marten taken by a residentnew text begin or nonresidentnew text end under age five must be included in the limit of the accompanying parent or guardian. (c) A resident or nonresident under age 13 must obtain a free turkey license to take turkey and may take a turkey without a firearms safety certificate if the resident or nonresident is accompanied by an adult parent or guardian who has a firearms safety certificate. (d) A resident under age 13 may apply for a prairie-chicken license and may take a prairie chicken without a firearms safety certificate if the resident is accompanied by an adult parent or guardian who has a firearms safety certificate. new text begin (e) Section 97B.601, subdivisions 3 and 3a, do not apply to nonresidents taking small game under this subdivision. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97A.475, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Resident hunting. Fees for the following licenses, to be issued to residents only, are: (1) for persons age 18 or over and under age 65 to take small game, $15.50; (2) for persons age 65 or over, $7 to take small game; (3) for persons age 18 or over to take turkey, $26; (4) for persons age 13 or over and under age 18 to take turkey, $5; (5) for persons age 18 or over to take deer with firearms during the regular firearms season, $34; (6) for persons age 18 or over to take deer by archery, $34; (7) for persons age 18 or over to take deer by muzzleloader during the muzzleloader season, $34; (8) to take moose, for a party of not more than six persons, $356; (9) for persons age 18 or over to take bear, $44; (10) to take elk, for a party of not more than two persons, $287; (11) to take light geese during the light goose conservation order, $2.50; (12) to take sandhill crane during the sandhill crane season, $3; (13) to take prairie chickens, $23; (14) for persons age 13 or over and under age 18 to take deer with firearms during the regular firearms season, $5; (15) for persons age 13 or over and under age 18 to take deer by archery, $5; (16) for persons age 13 or over and under age 18 to take deer by muzzleloader during the muzzleloader season, $5; (17) for persons age 10, 11, or 12 to take bear, no fee; (18) for persons age 13 or over and under age 18 to take bear, $5; (19) for persons age 18 or over to take small game for a consecutive 72-hour period selected by the licensee, $19, of which an amount equal to one-half of the fee for the migratory-waterfowl stamp under subdivision 5, clause (1), shall be deposited in the waterfowl habitat improvement account under section 97A.075, subdivision 2; one-half of the fee for the pheasant stamp under subdivision 5, clause (2), shall be deposited in the pheasant habitat improvement account under section 97A.075, subdivision 4; and one-half of the small-game surcharge under subdivision 4, shall be deposited in the wildlife acquisition account; deleted text begin (20) for persons age 16 or over and under age 18 to take small game, $5; deleted text end deleted text begin (21)deleted text end new text begin (20)new text end to take wolf, $30; deleted text begin (22)deleted text end new text begin (21)new text end for persons age 12 and under to take turkey, no fee; deleted text begin (23)deleted text end new text begin (22)new text end for persons age 10, 11, or 12 to take deer by firearm, no fee; deleted text begin (24)deleted text end new text begin (23)new text end for persons age 10, 11, or 12 to take deer by archery, no fee; and deleted text begin (25)deleted text end new text begin (24)new text end for persons age 10, 11, or 12 to take deer by muzzleloader during the muzzleloader season, no fee. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97A.475, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Nonresident hunting. (a) Fees for the following licenses, to be issued to nonresidents, are: (1) for persons age 18 or over to take small game, $90.50; (2) for persons age 18 or over to take deer with firearms during the regular firearms season, $180; (3) for persons age 18 or over to take deer by archery, $180; (4) for persons age 18 or over to take deer by muzzleloader during the muzzleloader season, $180; (5) for persons age 18 or over to take bear, $225; (6) for persons age 18 or over to take turkey, $91; (7) for persons age 13 or over and under age 18 to take turkey, $5; (8) to take raccoon or bobcat, $178; (9) to take light geese during the light goose conservation order, $2.50; (10) to take sandhill crane during the sandhill crane season, $3; (11) for persons age 13 or over and under age 18 to take deer with firearms during the regular firearms season in any open season option or time period, $5; (12) for persons age 13 or over and under age 18 to take deer by archery, $5; (13) for persons age 13 or over and under age 18 to take deer during the muzzleloader season, $5; (14) for persons age 13 or over and under 18 to take bear, $5; (15) for persons age 18 or over to take small game for a consecutive 72-hour period selected by the licensee, $75, of which an amount equal to one-half of the fee for the migratory-waterfowl stamp under subdivision 5, clause (1), shall be deposited in the waterfowl habitat improvement account under section 97A.075, subdivision 2; one-half of the fee for the pheasant stamp under subdivision 5, clause (2), shall be deposited in the pheasant habitat improvement account under section 97A.075, subdivision 4; and one-half of the small-game surcharge under subdivision 4, shall be deposited into the wildlife acquisition account; deleted text begin (16) for persons age 16 or 17 to take small game, $5; deleted text end deleted text begin (17)deleted text end new text begin (16)new text end to take wolf, $250; deleted text begin (18)deleted text end new text begin (17)new text end for persons age 12 and under to take turkey, no fee; deleted text begin (19)deleted text end new text begin (18)new text end for persons age 10, 11, or 12 to take deer by firearm, no fee; deleted text begin (20)deleted text end new text begin (19)new text end for persons age 10, 11, or 12 to take deer by archery, no fee; deleted text begin (21)deleted text end new text begin (20)new text end for persons age 10, 11, or 12 to take deer by muzzleloader during the muzzleloader season, no fee; and deleted text begin (22)deleted text end new text begin (21)new text end for persons age 10, 11, or 12 to take bear, no fee. (b) A $5 surcharge shall be added to nonresident hunting licenses issued under paragraph (a), clauses (1) to (6) and (8). An additional commission may not be assessed on this surcharge. Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97A.475, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Resident fishing. Fees for the following licenses, to be issued to residents only, are: (1) for persons age 18 or over to take fish by angling, $25; (2) for persons age 18 or over to take fish by angling, for a combined license for a married couple, $40; (3) for persons age 18 or over to take fish by spearing from a dark house, $6, and the person must possess an angling license; (4) for persons age 18 or over to take fish by angling for a 24-hour period selected by the licensee, $12; (5) for persons age 18 or over to take fish by angling for a consecutive 72-hour period selected by the licensee, $14;new text begin andnew text end (6) for persons age 18 or over to take fish by angling for three consecutive years, $71deleted text begin ; anddeleted text end new text begin .new text end deleted text begin (7) for persons age 16 or over and under age 18 to take fish by angling, $5. deleted text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97A.475, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Nonresident fishing. (a) Fees for the following licenses, to be issued to nonresidents, are: (1) for persons age 18 or over to take fish by angling, $46; (2) for persons age 18 or over to take fish by angling limited to seven consecutive days selected by the licensee, $38; (3) for persons age 18 or over to take fish by angling for a consecutive 72-hour period selected by the licensee, $31; (4) for persons age 18 or over to take fish by angling for a combined license for a family for one or both parents and dependent children under the age of 16, $63; (5) for persons age 18 or over to take fish by angling for a 24-hour period selected by the licensee, $14; (6) to take fish by angling for a combined license for a married couple, limited to 14 consecutive days selected by one of the licensees, $49;new text begin andnew text end (7) for persons age 18 or over to take fish by spearing from a dark house, $12, and the person must possess an angling licensedeleted text begin ; anddeleted text end new text begin .new text end deleted text begin (8) for persons age 16 or over and under age 18 to take fish by angling, $5. deleted text end (b) A $5 surcharge shall be added to all nonresident fishing licenses, except licenses issued under paragraph (a), clauses (5) and (8). An additional commission may not be assessed on this surcharge. Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97A.475, subdivision 20, is amended to read: Subd. 20. Trapping licenses. (a) The fee for a license to trap fur-bearing animals, other than wolves, is: deleted text begin (1) for residents over age 13 and under age 18, $5; deleted text end deleted text begin (2)deleted text end new text begin (1)new text end for residents age 18 or over and under age 65, $23; deleted text begin (3)deleted text end new text begin (2)new text end for residents age 65 or over, $11.50; and deleted text begin (4)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end for nonresidents, $84. (b) The fee for a license to trap wolves is $30, to be issued to residents only. Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97B.022, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Requirements. (a) A resident or nonresident born after December 31, 1979, who is age 12 or over and who does not possess a hunter education firearms safety certificate or a resident or nonresident born after December 31, 1989, who does not possess a trapper education certificate may be issued an apprentice-hunter/trapper validation. An apprentice-hunter/trapper validation may be purchased two license years in a lifetime and used to obtain hunting or trapping licenses during the same license year that the validation is purchased. (b) An individual in possession of an apprentice-hunter/trapper validation may take small gamedeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin and antlerlessnew text end deerdeleted text begin , and beardeleted text end only when accompanied by an adult who has a valid license to take the same species of game in Minnesota and whose license was not obtained using an apprentice validation. new text begin (c) An individual in possession of an apprentice-hunter validation may hunt deer, other than antlerless deer, and bear only when accompanied by a resident adult who has a valid license to hunt the same species of game in Minnesota and whose license was not obtained using an apprentice-hunter validation. new text end deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end When an individual in possession of an apprentice-hunter/trapper validation is hunting turkey or prairie chicken under paragraph (b), the accompanying adult may be licensed for another permit area or time period but must be licensed for the same season as the apprentice hunter. If the accompanying adult is not licensed for the same permit area or time period as the apprentice hunter, the accompanying adult may not shoot or possess a firearm or bow while accompanying the apprentice hunter under this paragraph. deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (e)new text end An apprentice-hunter/trapper-validation holder must obtain all required licenses and stamps. Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97B.601, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Exception to license requirements. (a) A resident new text begin or nonresident new text end under age deleted text begin 16deleted text end new text begin 18new text end may take small game, other than wolves, deleted text begin without a small-game license, and a resident under age 13 maydeleted text end new text begin and new text end trap small game and fur-bearing animals, other than wolves, deleted text begin without a trapping license,deleted text end as provided in section 97A.451, subdivision 3. (b) A person may take small game, other than wolves, without a small-game license on land occupied by the person as a principal residence. (c) An owner or occupant may take certain small game causing damage without a small-game or trapping license as provided in section 97B.655. (d) A person may use dogs to pursue and tree raccoons under section 97B.621, subdivision 2, during the closed season without a license. (e) A person may take a wolf, turkey, or prairie chicken without a small-game license. Sec. 10. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97A.451, subdivisions 2a, 3b, 5, and 6, new text end new text begin are repealed. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 25-02517 97A.451 LICENSE REQUIREMENTS AND EXEMPTIONS RELATING TO AGE. Subd. 2a. Residents age 16 or 17; spearing. Residents age 16 or over and under age 18 may take fish by spearing without a spearing license but must possess a fishing license under section 97A.475, subdivision 6, clause (7). Subd. 3b. Nonresidents age 16 or over and under age 18; small game. A nonresident age 16 or over and under age 18 may take small game by firearms or archery and may obtain a small-game license at the youth fee under section 97A.475, subdivision 3, paragraph (a), clause (14), if the nonresident possesses a firearms safety certificate or an apprentice-hunter validation as provided under section 97B.022. Subd. 5. Nonresident youth; angling. (a) A nonresident under age 16 may: (1) take fish by angling without a license if a parent or guardian has a fishing license. Fish taken by a nonresident under age 16 without a license must be included in the limit of the parent or guardian; (2) purchase a youth fishing license under section 97A.475, subdivision 7, paragraph (a), clause (8), and possess a limit of fish; or (3) be included under a nonresident family angling license and possess a limit of fish. (b) A nonresident age 16 or over and under age 18 must purchase a youth license to angle under section 97A.475, subdivision 7, paragraph (a), clause (8). (c) Nonresidents age 16 or over and under age 18 may take fish by spearing without a spearing license but must possess a fishing license under section 97A.475, subdivision 7, paragraph (a), clause (8). (d) Nonresidents under age 16 may take fish by spearing without a spearing or angling license. (e) Limits for fish taken by spearing must comply with one of the options listed under paragraph (a). Subd. 6. Nonresidents under age 16 attending camps; fishing. A nonresident under the age of 16 that is attending a camp conducted by a nonprofit organization may take fish by angling in adjacent and connected public waters without a license. The organization must have a certificate from the commissioner that describes the public waters where the fishing is allowed. The nonresident must possess a document, prescribed by the commissioner, for identification of the nonresident and the authorized fishing waters. The document must be signed and dated within the current calendar year by the person in charge of the camp.